District of Columbia statutes.
14-308

Assessment officials as expert witnesses in condemnation proceedings.

In an action for the condemnation of lands, an official or other employee of the District, charged with the duty of appraising real property for assessment purposes, is not disqualified, by reason of the fact that he is so employed, from testifying as an expert witness to the market value of lands, and as to benefits.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 520, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 14-308.
1973 Ed., § 14-308.

Prior Codifications